Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5864.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10. (1) There is levied upon on every owner of a qualified facility to which a commercial rehabilitation exemption certificate is issued a specific tax to be known as the commercial rehabilitation tax. (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8), the amount of the commercial rehabilitation tax, in each year, shall be is determined by adding the results of both of the following calculations: (a) Multiplying the total mills levied as ad valorem taxes for that year by all taxing units within which the qualified facility is located by the taxable value of the real and personal property of the qualified facility on the December 31 immediately preceding the effective date of the commercial rehabilitation exemption certificate after deducting the taxable value of the land and of personal property other than personal property assessed pursuant to under sections 8(d) and 14(6) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.8 and 211.14, for the tax year immediately preceding the effective date of the commercial rehabilitation exemption certificate. (b) Multiplying the mills levied for school operating purposes for that year under the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, and the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, by the taxable value of the real and personal property of the qualified facility, after deducting all of the following: (i) The taxable value of the land and of the personal property other than personal property assessed pursuant to under sections 8(d) and 14(6) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.8 and 211.14. (ii) The taxable value used to calculate the tax under subdivision (a). (3) The commercial rehabilitation tax is an annual tax, payable at the same times, in the same installments, and to the same officer or officers as taxes imposed under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155, are payable. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the officer or officers shall disburse the commercial rehabilitation tax payments received by the officer or officers each year to and among this state, cities, school districts, counties, and authorities, at the same times and in the same proportions as required by law for the disbursement of taxes collected under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (4) For intermediate school districts receiving state aid under sections 56, 62, and 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681, of the amount of commercial rehabilitation tax that would otherwise be disbursed to an intermediate school district, all or a portion, to be determined on the basis of the tax rates being utilized to compute the amount of state aid, shall must be paid to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (5) The amount of commercial rehabilitation tax described in subsections (2)(a) and (8)(a) that would otherwise be disbursed to a local school district for school operating purposes, and all of the amount described in subsections (2)(b) and (8)(b), shall must be paid instead to the state treasury and credited to the state school aid fund established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (6) The officer or officers shall send a copy of the amount of disbursement made to each unit under this section to the commission on a form provided by the commission. (7) A qualified facility located in a renaissance zone under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, or, if the qualified facility is not residential rental property, in a HOPE zone under the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act is exempt from the commercial rehabilitation tax levied under this act to the extent and for the duration provided pursuant to under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, or the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act, except for that portion of the commercial rehabilitation tax attributable to a special assessment or a tax described in section 7ff(2) or (9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. The commercial rehabilitation tax calculated under this subsection shall must be disbursed proportionately to the taxing unit or units that levied the special assessment or the tax described in section 7ff(2) or (9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. As used in this subsection, "residential rental property" means that term as defined in section 7ff of the general property tax act, MCL 211.7ff. (8) The amount of the commercial rehabilitation tax, in each year, for a qualified retail food establishment that was issued a certificate on or before December 31, 2009, shall be is determined by adding the results of both of the following calculations: (a) Multiplying the total mills levied as ad valorem taxes for that year by all taxing units within which the qualified facility is located by the taxable value of the real and personal property of the qualified facility on the December 31 immediately preceding the rehabilitation after deducting the taxable valuation of the land and of personal property other than personal property assessed pursuant to under sections 8(d) and 14(6) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.8 and 211.14, for the tax year immediately preceding the rehabilitation. (b) Multiplying the mills levied for school operating purposes for that year under the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, and the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, by the taxable value of the real and personal property of the qualified retail food establishment, after deducting all of the following: (i) The taxable value of the land and of the personal property other than personal property assessed pursuant to under sections 8(d) and 14(6) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.8 and 211.14. (ii) The taxable value used to calculate the tax under subdivision (a). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01123'25) or House Bill No. 5852 (request no. H01123'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05500'25) or House Bill No. 5856 (request no. H05500'25).